Hawaii statutes.
[§373L-8] Fees. (a) No applicant
shall be allowed to register pursuant to this chapter unless the appropriate
fees have been paid.

(b) Effective July 1, 2013, the director shall
collect fees in the following amounts:

(1) Registration fee $ 500

(2) Biennial renewal fee $ 750

(3) Restoration fee $1,500

until such time as the director amends the fees by
rulemaking pursuant to chapter 91.

(c) The fees collected pursuant to this
section shall be deposited into the state general fund. [L 2013, c 174, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next